Washington statutes.
RCW 36.145.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board of supervisors" or "board" means the governing body of a community facilities district.

(2) "Community facilities district" or "district" means a district created under this chapter.

(3) "Facility" or "facilities" means the local improvements included under RCW 36.145.100.

(4) "Legislative authority" means the governing body of a county, city, or town to which a petition or amended petition is submitted.

(a) If the proposed district is located entirely within unincorporated land, then the county is the exclusive "legislative authority" for purposes of approving formation of the district under RCW 36.145.020 through 36.145.070, inclusive, and RCW 36.145.080.

(b) If all or a portion of the proposed district is located within unincorporated land that is entirely surrounded by an incorporated city or town, then the "legislative authority" for purposes of approving formation of the district under RCW 36.145.020 through 36.145.070, inclusive, and RCW 36.145.080 includes the governing bodies of the county and the city or town surrounding the unincorporated land.

(c) If the proposed district is located entirely within incorporated land, then the city or town is the exclusive "legislative authority" for purposes of this chapter, and all powers and responsibilities of a county under this chapter must be exercised by that city or town.

(5) "Petition" means a request, meeting the requirements of RCW 36.145.020, made by landowners to form a community facilities district and to voluntarily submit their land to the assessments authorized under this chapter and includes an amended petition meeting the requirements of RCW 36.145.020(3).

(6) "Special assessment" means an assessment imposed in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

[ 2010 c 7 s 102.]